California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
In the action a certificate issued by the board showing unpaid taxes determined against any supplier shall be prima facie evidence of all of the following:

(a) The determination of the tax, the delinquency thereof, and the amount of the tax, interest, penalties, and costs due and unpaid to the state.

(b) The indebtedness of the supplier to the state in the amount of the tax, interest, and penalties
 therein appearing unpaid.

(c) The full compliance by all persons required to perform administrative duties under this part with all the forms of law in relation to the determination and levy of the tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Lien of Tax [7872. - 7872.]

7872.

(a) If any person fails to pay any amount imposed under this part at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. Such a lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. 

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts disclosed
 on a return received by the board before the date the return is delinquent, the date the return would have been delinquent;

(2) For amounts disclosed on a return filed on or after the date the return is delinquent, the date the return is received by the board;

(3) For amounts determined under Section 7698 (pertaining to jeopardy assessments), the date the notice of the board’s finding is mailed or issued;

(4) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Warrant for Collection of Tax [7881. - 7884.]

7881.

At any time within three years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount herein required to be paid or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the Controller or his authorized representative may issue a warrant for the enforcement of any liens and for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

7882.

The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the same force and effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same force and effect as a levy of and sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7883.

The Controller may pay or advance to the sheriff or marshal, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for his or her services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The Controller, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 144.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7884.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Seizure and Sale [7891. - 7895.]

7891.

Whenever any supplier is delinquent in the payment of the tax, the Controller or his or her authorized representative may forthwith collect the tax due in the following manner: The Controller shall seize any property, real or personal, of the supplier, and thereafter sell the property, or a sufficient part of it, at public auction to pay the tax due together with any penalties, interest and any costs incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7892.

Notice of the sale and the time and place thereof shall be given to the delinquent supplier and to all persons who have an interest of record in the property in writing at least 20 days before the date set for the sale in the following manner: The notice shall be personally served or enclosed in an envelope addressed to the supplier or other person at his or her last known residence or place of business in this state. If not personally served, the notice shall be deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid. The notice shall
 be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city in which the property or a part thereof is situated if any part thereof is situated in a city or, if not, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property or a part thereof is located. Notice shall also be posted in both of the following manners:

(a) One public place in the city in which the interest in property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city or, if not to be sold in a city, one public place in the county in which the interest in the property is to be sold.

(b) One conspicuous place on the property.

The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, a statement of the amount of the taxes, penalties, interest, and costs, the name of the supplier, and the
 further statement that unless the taxes, penalties, interest, and costs are paid on or before the time fixed in the notice for the sale, the property, or so much of it as may be necessary, will be sold in accordance with law and the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7893.

At the sale the Controller or his or her authorized agent shall sell the property in accordance with law and the notice and shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests title in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the supplier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7894.

The Controller may bid at the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7895.

If upon the sale the moneys received exceed the amount of all taxes, penalties, interest, and costs due the state from the supplier, the Controller shall return the excess to the supplier and obtain a receipt. If for any reason the receipt of the supplier is not available, the Controller shall deposit the excess moneys in an unclaimed property account, in trust for the supplier, subject to the order of the supplier, the supplier’s heirs, successors, or assigns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Collection of Tax From Deposited Security [7916. - 7916.]

7916.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the Controller setting forth the amount of a taxpayer’s delinquencies, the board shall pay to the Controller the amount so certified from the money deposited with the board by the taxpayer or from the amounts received from the sale of bonds or other obligations deposited with the board by the taxpayer. Securities deposited with the board which have a prevailing market price may be sold by the board for the purposes of this section at private sale at a price not lower than the prevailing market price thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 38, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sale of State-Acquired Property [7931. - 7935.]

7931.

Whenever the state acquires any real or personal property seized and sold for delinquent taxes of the supplier, the Controller may, with the consent of the Department of General Services, sell the property or any part thereof at private sale or at public auction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7932.

He may advertise the sale by one publication, at least 10 days before the date set for the sale, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the property to be sold is situated. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the county, publication may be made by posting notice in three public places in the county 10 days prior to the date of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7933.

The Controller or his authorized representative shall conduct the sale, and he may reject any or all bids at the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7934.

The Controller shall distribute the proceeds of the sale in the following order:

(a) The payment of all expenses of the sale.

(b) The payment of all amounts due from the supplier under this part.

(c) The remainder to the General Fund of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7935.

At the sale the Controller shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for any personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests title in the purchaser free from any existing lien for amounts due under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 874.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Payment on Termination of Business [7956. - 7959.]

7956.

Whenever a supplier ceases to engage in business as a supplier within the state by reason of the discontinuance, sale, or transfer of the business, the supplier shall give notice in writing thereof to the board on or before the date of the discontinuance, sale, or transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7957.

The notice shall give the date of discontinuance or, in the event of a sale or transfer of the business, the date thereof and the name and address of the purchaser or transferee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7958.

All amounts under this part, not yet due and payable under other provisions hereof, become due and payable concurrently with the discontinuance, sale, or transfer. The supplier shall forthwith make a report and pay all of the amounts due and shall surrender the supplier’s license to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

7959.

Unless notice is given as provided by Section 7956, the purchaser or transferee becomes liable for all taxes and penalties under this part accrued against the vendor or transferor to the date of the sale or transfer, but only to the extent of the value of the property and business thereby acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Miscellaneous Provisions [7982. - 7983.]

7982.

The remedies of the State provided for in this chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the Controller or the Attorney General constitutes an election by the State to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7983.

The board shall not be subject to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16307 of the Corporations Code unless, at the time of application for or issuance of a permit, license, or registration number under this part, the applicant furnishes to the board a written partnership agreement that provides that all business assets shall be held in the name of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Overpayments and Refunds [8101. - 8191.]



  ARTICLE 1. Refunds on Certain Sales [8101. - 8109.]

8101.

The following persons who have paid a tax for motor vehicle fuel, either directly or to the vendor from whom it was purchased, or indirectly by the adding of the amount of the tax to the price of the fuel, shall, except as otherwise provided in this part, be reimbursed and repaid the amount of the tax:

(a) Any person who buys and uses the motor vehicle fuel for
 purposes other than operating motor vehicles upon the public highways of the state, except vehicles subject to identification under Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) of the Vehicle Code, which are used for recreational purposes or are rented or leased for recreational purposes, and, on and after July 1, 1974, except motor vehicles subject to registration under Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Vehicle Code while engaged in off-highway recreational use.

(b) Any person who exports the motor vehicle fuel for use outside of this state. Motor vehicle fuel carried from this state in the fuel tank of a motor vehicle or aircraft is not deemed to be exported from this state unless the motor vehicle fuel becomes subject to tax as an “import” under the laws of the destination state.

(c) Any person who sells the motor vehicle fuel to the Armed Forces of the United
 States for use in ships or aircraft or for use outside this state, under circumstances that would have entitled him or her to an exemption from the payment of the tax under Section 7401 had he or she been the supplier of this fuel.

(d) Any person who buys and uses the motor vehicle fuel in any construction equipment which is exempt from vehicle registration pursuant to the Vehicle Code, while operated within the confines and limits of a construction project.

(e) Any supplier who sells motor vehicle fuel which is sold to any consulate officer or consulate employee under circumstances which would have entitled the supplier to an exemption under paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 7401 if the supplier had sold the motor vehicle fuel directly to the consulate officer or consulate employee.

(f) Any supplier who
 removes motor vehicle fuel at a rack and pays tax on that removal or who purchases tax-paid motor vehicle fuel outside the bulk transfer/terminal system and then delivers the tax-paid motor vehicle fuel to another approved terminal from which that supplier subsequently removes the tax-paid motor vehicle fuel at the terminal rack, but only to the extent that the supplier can show that tax on the same amount of motor vehicle fuel has been paid more than one time by the same supplier.

(g) Any supplier who purchases tax-paid motor vehicle fuel in the bulk transfer/terminal system and subsequently removes the tax-paid motor vehicle fuel at the terminal rack, but only to the extent that the supplier can show that tax on the same amount of motor vehicle fuel has been paid more than one time by the same supplier. This subdivision applies only to those purchases made on or after January 1, 2002.

(h) Any person who buys and uses tax-paid motor vehicle fuel for the purpose of producing a blended fuel that will be used to operate motor vehicles upon the public highways of the state that is taxed under Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601) of Division 2. To be eligible, a person must show that the applicable California fuel tax has been paid and must submit or have submitted the refund application request on or after January 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 493, Sec. 1.   (SB 1485)   Effective September 23, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8101.1.

For the purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 8101, the tax shall be refunded to any person with respect to fuel used in the operation of a motor vehicle on any highway which is under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Agriculture and with respect to the use of such highway such person pays, or contributes to, the cost of construction or maintenance thereof pursuant to an agreement with or permission of, the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1682.)
-------------------------------------------

8101.5.

No refund of any tax shall be granted on motor vehicle fuel used in propelling an aircraft in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1027, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

8101.6.

(a) No refund of any tax shall be granted on motor vehicle fuel used in propelling passenger carrying vehicles, except six cents ($0.06) of the tax imposed upon each gallon of motor vehicle fuel used in propelling passenger carrying vehicles used for the transportation of persons for hire, compensation, or profit of the following:

(1) Any transit district, transit authority, or city owning and operating a local transit system itself or through a wholly owned nonprofit corporation.

(2) Any private
 entity providing transportation services for the transportation of people under contract or agreement, except general franchise agreements, with a public agency authorized to provide public transportation services, including, but not limited to, any nonprofit corporation designated as a consolidated transportation service agency pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 15975 of the Government Code, which provides door-to-door transportation services under contract or agreement with a transit district, transit authority, or public agency authorized to provide transportation services, but only for fuels consumed while providing services under those contracts or agreements entered into subsequent to the effective date of this act.

(3) Any passenger stage corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission when the motor vehicles of such passenger stage corporation are exclusively operated in urban or suburban areas or between
 cities in close proximity; provided, however, that the exemption is not extended to any line or lines operated by such passenger stage corporation which shall exceed 50 miles of one-way route mileage.

(4) Any common carrier of passengers operating exclusively on any line or lines within the limits of a single city between fixed termini or over a regular route, 98 percent of whose operations, as measured by total route mileage operated, are exclusively within the limits of a single city, and who by reason thereof is not a passenger stage corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(b) The exemption provided for in subdivision (a) shall not be applicable to motor vehicle fuel used by a charter-party carrier of passengers. The term “charter-party carrier of passengers” has the same meaning as that specified in Section 5360 of the Public Utilities Code
 and shall further include those transportation services described in subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 5353 of the Public Utilities Code, if such transportation service is rendered as contract carriage and not as common carriage of passengers.

(c) There are in the State of California many private entities providing public transportation services for the transportation of people in vehicles other than buses under contract or agreement with local government, transit districts or local bus transit operators. It is the purpose of this section to provide relief from the payment of fuel tax for gasoline fuel for those private entities only for fuels consumed while providing these services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8101.7.

No refund of any tax shall be granted which is attributable to the distribution of motor vehicle fuel for use or used in propelling a vessel in the state, except any tax which is attributable to the distribution of motor vehicle fuel for use or used in propelling a vessel operated by its owner on waters located on private property owned or controlled by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1400.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

(a) The claimant of a refund shall present to the Controller a claim supported by the original invoice showing the purchase or other evidence of each purchase that is satisfactory to the Controller. The claim shall state the total amount of the fuel purchased by the claimant and the manner and the equipment in which the claimant has used the fuel. The claim shall state the total amount of motor vehicle fuel covered by the claim and if the motor vehicle fuel was exported, a statement that the claimant has proof of exportation. The claim
 shall state that the amounts claimed have not been previously refunded to the claimant and that there are no other claims outstanding for the amounts included in the current claim for refund. The claim shall not be under oath but shall contain, or be accompanied by, a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. If no original invoice was created, electronic invoicing shall be accepted as reflected by a computerized facsimile when accompanied by an original copy of the bill of lading or fuel manifest that can be directly tied to the electronic invoice.

(b) Each claim for refund under this section shall be made on a form prescribed by the Controller and shall be filed for a calendar year, except for claims relating to exportation of fuel. If, at the close of any of the first three quarters of the calendar year, more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) is refundable under this section with respect to any motor vehicle
 fuel used, sold, or exported during that quarter or any prior quarter during the calendar year, and for which no other claim has been filed, a claim may be filed for the quarterly period. To facilitate the administration of this section, the Controller may require the filing of claims for refund for other than yearly periods. Export claims may be filed at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 697, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

The Controller, upon the presentation of the properly completed claim and the invoice or other evidence of each purchase that is satisfactory to the Controller, shall cause to be paid to the claimant from the taxes collected under this part an amount equal to the taxes collected on the motor vehicle fuel in respect to which the refund is claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.5.

Any person who wilfully makes or subscribes to a claim for refund under this article which he does not believe to be true and correct as to every material matter, shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to the penalties prescribed for perjury by the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.

In order to establish the validity of any claim the Controller may, upon demand, examine the books and records of the claimant for that purpose. The failure of the claimant to accede to that demand constitutes a waiver of all right to the refund claimed on account of the transactions questioned. The examination may be made either through employees of the office of the Controller or of the office of the board. Supporting evidence of all purchases included in a claim for refund shall be maintained by the claimant for inspection by the Controller or the office of
 the board for four years after the date of refund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 697, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.5.

If any person does not use motor vehicle fuel as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 8101 within the time required for filing an application for a refund, he may within that time file a written request with the Controller for an extension of time within which to apply for a refund. The request shall state the amount of fuel involved, the date of its purchase, and the manner and the equipment in which the fuel is intended to be used. Thereupon the Controller may extend the time within which an application for refund may be filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

8105.

All applications for refund provided under this article shall be filed within three years from the date of the purchase of the motor vehicle fuel or, if the tax was not invoiced at the time of the purchase of the motor vehicle fuel, the application for refund shall be filed within six months after the receipt of an invoice for the tax, whichever period expires later. Any application filed after the time prescribed shall not be considered for any purpose by the Controller, the Treasurer, or the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 605, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8106.

In lieu of the collection and refund of the tax on tax-paid motor vehicle fuel exported, removed, sold, or used by a supplier in a manner that would entitle the supplier to claim a refund under Section 8101, credit may be given the supplier upon the supplier’s tax return, and the determination of the amount of tax shall be determined in accordance with any rules and regulations the board may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8107.

No refund shall be granted for losses in handling, transporting, or storing motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

8108.

If any claim for refund of tax is paid more than 20 calendar days from the date upon which the claim was received by the Controller, interest shall be computed, allowed, and paid upon that refund of tax at the Pooled Money Investment Account’s Annual Yield Rate in effect on the date prior to the date that the interest on the refund of tax begins to accrue. Interest on the refund of tax shall begin to accrue on the 21st calendar day after the date that a properly completed claim for refund is received by the Controller. The interest shall accrue through the date
 the Controller refunds the tax. No interest shall be granted on credits taken on tax returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 76, Sec. 8.   Effective July 16, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8109.

(a) A refund filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8101 shall be paid to the claimant within 20 calendar days of the receipt of a claim for refund by the Controller.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the claim for refund shall be submitted on a properly completed form or in substantially similar format, as prescribed by the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 76, Sec. 9.   Effective July 16, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Claim for Refund [8126. - 8131.]

8126.

If the department determines that any amount not required to be paid under this part has been paid by any person to the state, the department shall set forth that fact in its records and certify the amount collected in excess of the amount legally due and the person from whom it was collected and certify the amount to the Controller for credit or refund. Any determination by the department pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 16.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8127.

The Controller shall thereupon credit the excess on any amounts then due from the person under this part and refund the balance to the person or his successors, administrators, executors, or assigns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

8127.5.

When an amount represented by a person who is a taxpayer under this part to a customer as constituting reimbursement for taxes due under this part is computed upon an amount that is not taxable or is in excess of the taxable amount and is actually paid by the customer to the person, the amount so paid shall be returned by the person to the customer upon notification by the Board of Equalization or by the customer that the excess has been ascertained. If the person fails or refuses to do so, the amount so paid, if knowingly or mistakenly computed by the person
 upon an amount that is not taxable or is in excess of the taxable amount, shall be remitted by that person to this state. Those amounts remitted to the state shall be credited by the Controller on any amounts due and payable under this part on the same transaction from the person by whom it was paid to this state and the balance, if any, shall constitute an obligation due from the person to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8128.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) no refund under this article shall be approved by the board after three years from the last day of the month following the month for which the overpayment was made, or with respect to determinations made under Article 3, 4, or 5 of Chapter 5 of this part, after six months from the date the determinations become final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires the later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the board within that period.
 No credit shall be approved by the board after the expiration of that period unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within that period, or unless the credit relates to a period for which a waiver is given pursuant to Section 7676.

(b) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver is given under Section 7676 if a claim therefor is filed with the board before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8128.1.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 8128 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last for
 a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existence thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8129.

The claim shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which it is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

8130.

Interest shall be paid upon any overpayment of any amount of tax at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the first day of the month following the period during which the overpayment is made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the claimant with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In the
 case of a refund, to the last day of the month following the date upon which the person making the overpayment, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is the earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8131.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Suit for Refund [8146. - 8152.]

8146.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this state or against any officer of the state to prevent or enjoin the collection under this part of any tax determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8147.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount collected or paid under this part unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed under Article 1 or 2 of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

8148.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of action upon a claim for refund or credit, the claimant may bring an action against the Controller with respect to a claim under Article 1 of this chapter, or against the board with respect to a claim filed under Article 2 of this chapter on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

8149.

If the board or the Controller fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the Controller or the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

8149.5.

Failure to bring suit or action within the time specified in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the State on account of any alleged claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

8150.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any taxes due from the plaintiff under this part, Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), and Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001), and the balance of the judgment shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

8151.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5 upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment thereof to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8152.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the State Treasurer to recover any tax paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the supplier paying the tax or by any person other than the person who paid the tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1053, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 53 of Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [8171. - 8174.]

8171.

(a) The Controller may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering any
 erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 7670) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 7698) of Chapter 5. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8172.

In any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8171, the court may, with the consent of the Attorney General, order a change in the place of trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8173.

The Attorney General shall prosecute any action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8171, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials, and appeals shall apply to the proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8174.
